District of Columbia statutes.
3-413.01

Disputes.

Disputes concerning the rights to the control or the disposition of the remains of a deceased person shall be resolved by a court of competent jurisdiction. In resolving a dispute, the court shall consider the following factors:

(1)

The reasonableness, practicality, and resources available for payment for the proposed arrangements and final disposition;

(2)

The degree of the personal relationship between the decedent and each of the persons in the same degree of relationship to the decedent;

(3)

The expressed wishes and directions of the decedent and the extent to which the decedent has provided resources for the purpose of carrying out those wishes or directions; and

(4)

The degree to which the arrangements and final disposition will allow for participation by all who wish to pay respect to the decedent.

History

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 14a
as added Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 902(b), 48 DCR 6981

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Funeral Services Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-219, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3461).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Funeral Services Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-8, March 2, 2001, 48 DCR 2487).